apertium-ltz.ltz.dix
<pardef n="bes/ëtzen__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>ëtze</l>      <r>ëtzen<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iess</l>      <r>ëtzen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ëtze</l>      <r>ëtzen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ëtz</l>       <r>ëtzen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ëtzt</l>      <r>ëtzen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ëtze</l>      <r>ëtzen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ëtzt</l>      <r>ëtzen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ëtze</l>      <r>ëtzen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ëtz</l>       <r>ëtzen<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ëtzt</l>      <r>ëtzen<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="bew/eisen__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>eise</l>      <r>eisen<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ise</l>       <r>eisen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>eise</l>      <r>eisen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eis</l>       <r>eisen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eist</l>      <r>eisen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eise</l>      <r>eisen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eist</l>      <r>eisen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eise</l>      <r>eisen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>eis</l>       <r>eisen<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eist</l>      <r>eisen<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="bez/uelen__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>uele</l>      <r>uelen<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>uelt</l>      <r>uelen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>uele</l>      <r>uelen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ils</l>       <r>uelen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ilt</l>       <r>uelen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>uele</l>      <r>uelen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>uelt</l>      <r>uelen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>uele</l>      <r>uelen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>uel</l>       <r>uelen<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>uelt</l>      <r>uelen<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="bezw/éngen__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>énge</l>      <r>éngen<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>onge</l>      <r>éngen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>énge</l>      <r>éngen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>éngs</l>      <r>éngen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>éngt</l>      <r>éngen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>énge</l>      <r>éngen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>éngt</l>      <r>éngen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>énge</l>      <r>éngen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>éng</l>       <r>éngen<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>éngt</l>      <r>éngen<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="bi/dden__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>dde</l>       <r>dden<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>
  <!-- requires separate pp -->

  <e>       <p><l>dde</l>       <r>dden<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tts</l>       <r>dden<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tt</l>        <r>dden<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>dde</l>       <r>dden<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tt</l>        <r>dden<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>dde</l>       <r>dden<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>tt</l>        <r>dden<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tt</l>        <r>dden<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="bie/den__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>de</l>        <r>den<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>
  <!-- requires separate pp -->

  <e>       <p><l>de</l>        <r>den<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ts</l>        <r>den<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r>den<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>de</l>        <r>den<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r>den<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>de</l>        <r>den<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r>den<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r>den<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="bie/wen__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>we</l>        <r>wen<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>
  <!-- requires separate pp -->

  <e>       <p><l>we</l>        <r>wen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>fs</l>        <r>wen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ft</l>        <r>wen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>we</l>        <r>wen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ft</l>        <r>wen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>we</l>        <r>wen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>f</l>         <r>wen<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ft</l>        <r>wen<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="besëtzen">        <i>bes</i><par n="bes/ëtzen__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="beweisen">        <i>bew</i><par n="bew/eisen__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="bezuelen">        <i>bez</i><par n="bez/uelen__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="bezwéngen">       <i>bezw</i><par n="bezw/éngen__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="bidden">          <i>bi</i><par n="bi/dden__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="bieden">          <i>bie</i><par n="bie/den__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="biewen">          <i>bie</i><par n="bie/wen__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="bilden">          <i>bil</i><par n="bie/den__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="bludden">         <i>blu</i><par n="bi/dden__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="bueden">          <i>bue</i><par n="bie/den__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="dreiwen">         <i>drei</i><par n="bie/wen__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="fierwen">         <i>fier</i><par n="bie/wen__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="frieden">         <i>frie</i><par n="bie/den__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="geléngen">        <i>gel</i><par n="bezw/éngen__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="gierwen">         <i>gier</i><par n="bie/wen__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="gleewen">         <i>glee</i><par n="bie/wen__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="gruewen">         <i>grue</i><par n="bie/wen__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="hidden">          <i>hi</i><par n="bi/dden__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="hiewen">          <i>hie</i><par n="bie/wen__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="ierwen">          <i>ier</i><par n="bie/wen__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="iwwerweisen">     <i>iwwerw</i><par n="bew/eisen__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="kliewen">         <i>klie</i><par n="bie/wen__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="knieden">         <i>knie</i><par n="bie/den__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="liewen">          <i>lie</i><par n="bie/wen__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="lueden">          <i>lue</i><par n="bie/den__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="luewen">          <i>lue</i><par n="bie/wen__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="reiwen">          <i>rei</i><par n="bie/wen__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="rieden">          <i>rie</i><par n="bie/den__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="rueden">          <i>rue</i><par n="bie/den__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="schreiwen">       <i>schrei</i><par n="bie/wen__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="schwiewen">       <i>schwie</i><par n="bie/wen__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="steiwen">         <i>stei</i><par n="bie/wen__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="stierwen">        <i>stier</i><par n="bie/wen__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="striewen">        <i>strie</i><par n="bie/wen__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="waarden">         <i>waar</i><par n="bie/den__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="wiewen">          <i>wie</i><par n="bie/wen__vblex"/></e>
